Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1703
Agreement; other provisions applicable.

Any municipality that enters into an agreement for the purchase of power containing any of the provisions described in section 70-1702 shall be deemed to have entered into such agreement under the provisions of this section and sections 18-412.06 and 70-1705. No agreement shall be deemed an agreement entered into pursuant to sections 18-412.09 and 70-1704 unless such agreement specifically states that it is entered into pursuant to such sections.

Laws 2004, LB 969, § 3.